Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3202
County assessor
or deputy; county assessor certificate; required; exception.

No person shall be eligible to file for, be appointed
to, or hold the office of county assessor or serve as deputy assessor in any
county of this state unless he or she holds a county assessor certificate
issued pursuant to section 77-422.

Laws 1969, c. 623, § 3, p. 2521;

Laws 1983, LB 245, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-423;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 17;

Laws 1999, LB 194, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 14;

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 22;

Laws 2009, LB121, § 3.

The right of a person elected county assessor to assume office may be tested in quo waranto, mandamus, or injunction even though no election contest is filed. Shear v. County Board of Commissioners, 187 Neb. 849, 195 N.W.2d 151 (1972).